Illinois, session 104th, HB1793.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 517-3.4a and 34-52.5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/17-3.4a new)7    Sec. 17-3.4a. Tax increase; informational material.8    (a) In this Section, "informational material" means a 9one-page fact sheet distributed via U.S. mail to all residents 10of a school district. A school district may determine the form 11of the fact sheet. 12    (b) No later than 30 days before a school district submits 13to the voters of that district a question on whether to issue 14bonds or increase the school district's property tax rate, the 15school district must send informational material to each 16resident of voting age in the school district. The 17informational material must include all of the following, if 18applicable: 19        (1) A description of the project for which the bonds 20    will be issued.21        (2) A description of the estimated expenditures 22    associated with the increase in the property tax rate.23        (3) An estimate of the number of years during which   HB1793- 2 -LRB104 04062 LNS 14086 b1    the bonds will be outstanding.2        (4) An estimate of the total debt service to be paid on 3    the bonds, including principal, interest, and the costs of 4    issuing the bonds.5        (5) All potential outcomes related to the property 6    taxes of a median-priced house in the district for both if 7    the referendum passes and if the referendum fails.  8    (105 ILCS 5/34-52.5 new)9    Sec. 34-52.5. Tax increase; informational material.10    (a) In this Section, "informational material" means a 11one-page fact sheet distributed via U.S. mail to all residents 12of the school district. The school district may determine the 13form of the fact sheet. 14    (b) No later than 30 days before the school district 15submits to the voters of the district a question on whether to 16issue bonds or increase the school district's property tax 17rate, the school district must send informational material to 18each resident of voting age in the school district. The 19informational material must include all of the following, if 20applicable: 21        (1) A description of the project for which the bonds 22    will be issued.23        (2) A description of the estimated expenditures 24    associated with the increase in the property tax rate.25        (3) An estimate of the number of years during which   HB1793- 3 -LRB104 04062 LNS 14086 b1    the bonds will be outstanding.2        (4) An estimate of the total debt service to be paid on 3    the bonds, including principal, interest, and the costs of 4    issuing the bonds.5        (5) All potential outcomes related to the property 6    taxes of a median-priced house in the district for both if 7    the referendum passes and if the referendum fails.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.